Wyoming, session 2025, HB0210.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-12-801 is created to read:

ARTICLE 8
ADVISING OR ASSISTING ON VETERANS' BENEFITS

HB0210

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0581
40-12-801. Compensation for advising or assisting on
veterans' benefits prohibited; limitations; penalties;
definitions.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Veterans' benefits matter" means the
preparation, presentation or prosecution of any claim
affecting any person who has filed or expressed an intent
to file a claim for any state or federal benefit, program,
service, commodity, function or status, entitlement that is
determined under the laws and regulations administered by
the United States department of veterans affairs or the
Wyoming military department pertaining to veterans, their
dependents, their survivors and any other person eligible
for the benefits;

(ii) "Compensation" means the payment of any
money, thing of value or financial benefit.

(b) No person shall receive compensation for:

HB0210

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0581
(i) Advising or assisting any person with regard
to any veterans' benefits matter, except as permitted under
federal law and as provided by this section;

(ii) Referring any person to another person to
advise or assist the person with any veterans' benefits
matter.

(c) A person seeking to receive compensation for
advising or assisting any person with any veterans'
benefits matter shall, before rendering any advice or
assistance, memorialize all terms regarding the person's
payment of fees for services rendered in a written
agreement, signed by both parties, that adheres to all
criteria specified in 38 C.F.R. § 14.636.

(d) No person shall receive compensation for any
services rendered before the date on which a notice of
disagreement is filed with respect to the person's case.

(e) No person shall guarantee, either directly or by
implication, that any person is certain to receive specific
HB0210

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0581
veterans' benefits or a specific level, percentage or
amount of veterans' benefits.

(f) No person shall receive excessive or unreasonable
fees as compensation for advising or assisting any person
with any federal or state veterans' benefits matter. The
factors specified in 38 C.F.R. § 14.636 shall govern
determinations of whether a fee is excessive or
unreasonable.

(g) No person shall advise or assist for compensation
any person concerning any veterans' benefits matter without
clearly providing, at the outset of the business
relationship, the following disclosure, both orally and in
writing:

"This business is not sponsored by, or affiliated
with, the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, the Wyoming Military Department or any
other federally chartered veterans service
organization. Other organizations, including but
not limited to the Wyoming Military Department,
your local county veterans service agency and
HB0210

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0581
other federally chartered veterans' service
organizations, may be able to provide you with
this service free of charge. Products or services
offered by this business are not necessarily
endorsed by any of these organizations. You may
qualify for other veterans' benefits beyond the
benefits for which you are receiving services
here."

The written disclosure shall appear in not less than twelve
(12) point font and shall appear in a readily noticeable
and identifiable place in the person's agreement with the
person seeking services. The person shall verbally
acknowledge understanding and receipt of the oral
disclosure and shall sign the document in which the written
disclosure appears, to represent understanding of the
disclosure. The person offering services shall retain a
copy of the written disclosure while providing veterans'
benefits services for compensation to the person and for at
least one (1) year after the date on which the service
relationship terminates.

HB0210

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0581
(h) No person shall advertise for compensation
services in any veterans' benefits matters without
including the disclosure outlined in subsection (g) of this
section. If the advertisement is printed, including but not
limited to advertisements visible to internet users, the
disclosure shall appear in a readily visible place on the
advertisement. If the advertisement is verbal, the
disclosure shall be spoken as part of the advertisement in
the first instance.

(j) A person who violates this section commits an
unlawful practice under W.S. 40-12-105.

Section 2. W.S. 40-12-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xviii) is amended to read:

40-12-105. Unlawful practices.

(a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice
unlawful under this act when, in the course of his business
and in connection with a consumer transaction, he
knowingly:

HB0210

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0581
(xviii) Violates W.S. 40-12-801.

Section 3. This act shall apply to business
relationships or agreements that concern any veterans'
benefits matter where the business relationship begins on
and after July 1, 2025. Nothing in this act shall be
construed to impair existing agreements, contracts or other
obligations that concern any veterans' benefits matter that
were entered into before July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0210